Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska43-3329
Terms, defined.

For purposes of sections 43-3328 to 43-3339, the following definitions apply:

(1) Account means a demand deposit account, checking or negotiable withdrawal order account, savings account, time deposit account, or money-market mutual fund account;

(2) Authorized attorney has the same meaning as found in section 43-1704;

(3) Child support has the same meaning as found in section 43-1705;

(4) Department means the Department of Health and Human Services and if the department designates, includes a county attorney or authorized attorney;

(5) Financial institution means every federal or state commercial or savings bank, including savings and loan associations and cooperative banks, federal or state chartered credit unions, benefit associations, insurance companies, safe deposit companies, any money-market mutual fund as defined in section 851(a) of the Internal Revenue Code that seeks to maintain a constant net asset value of one dollar in accordance with 17 C.F.R. 270.2a-7, any broker, brokerage firm, trust company, or unit investment trust, or any other similar entity doing business or authorized to do business in the State of Nebraska;

(6) Match means a comparison by automated or other means by name and social security number of a list of obligors provided to a financial institution by the department and a list of depositors of any financial institution;

(7) Medical support has the same meaning as found in section 43-512;

(8) Obligor means a person who owes a duty of support pursuant to a support order;

(9) Payor includes a person, partnership, limited partnership, limited liability partnership, limited liability company, corporation, or other entity doing business or authorized to do business in the State of Nebraska, including a financial institution, or a department or an agency of state, county, or city government;

(10) Spousal support has the same meaning as found in section 43-1715;

(11) Support in the definitions of child support, medical support, and spousal support means providing necessary shelter, food, clothing, care, medical support, medical attention, education expenses, or funeral expenses or any other reasonable and necessary expense; and

(12) Support order has the same meaning as found in section 43-1717.

Laws 1997, LB 752, § 29;

Laws 2003, LB 245, § 5;

Laws 2007, LB296, § 163.